Oklahoma, session 2026, SB943.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma


Medical Freedom Act”.


B. The Legislature finds and declares the following:


1. During the years 2020 through 2022, federal government


agencies collaborated with medical organizations, media


personalities, social media platforms, and other influential


entities to orchestrate a coordinated and coercive propaganda


campaign. This campaign was characterized by psychological pressure

Req. No. 1436 Page 1


and public shaming directed at individuals who declined COVID-19


vaccinations, coupled with the aggressive suppression of dissenting


views, including those expressed by esteemed medical and scientific


professionals with extensive credentials;


2. This coordinated effort created an environment conducive to


the implementation of unconstitutional and unethical medical


mandates at federal, state, and local levels. These mandates


disregarded individual autonomy and the principles of informed


consent and due process, which are cornerstones of ethical medical


practice;


3. As a result of these mandates, thousands of Americans in the


public and private sectors, including Oklahoma citizens, were


unjustly terminated from their employment and/or lost retirement


benefits for exercising their right to medical freedom. Many others


were denied access to essential public accommodations, violating


their constitutional rights and creating severe social and economic


repercussions;


4. Emerging peer-reviewed studies and post-marketing


surveillance data have revealed that COVID-19 vaccinations, contrary


to the assertions of the propaganda campaign:


a. provided a substantially lower level of protection


against contracting and transmitting COVID-19 than


initially claimed, undermining the justification for


their widespread and mandatory administration, and

Req. No. 1436 Page 2


b. were associated with increased risks to heart health,


including myocarditis and pericarditis, particularly


in younger populations, as well as potential adverse


effects on fertility, raising significant public


health concerns; and


5. The State of Oklahoma bears a profound ethical and


constitutional obligation to safeguard its citizens from any future


recurrence of coercive medical mandates or campaigns that compromise


the principles of bodily autonomy, medical ethics, and public trust


in health care.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2010 of Title 25, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The right of a person to refuse any medical procedure,


medical treatment, device, vaccine, or prophylactic shall not be


questioned or interfered with in any manner. The right of a person


to public accommodation, to the equal protection of the law, and to


seek restitution for harm shall not be denied or infringed upon


because of the exercise of the rights contained in this section.


B. Health care professionals, including physicians, nurses, and


allied health providers, shall be protected from any disciplinary


action, loss of licensure, or professional penalties for:


1. Voicing concerns or dissent regarding medical mandates,


treatments, or protocols;

Req. No. 1436 Page 3


2. Advocating for patients’ rights to informed consent, medical


freedom, or access to alternative treatments; and


3. Disclosing information about unethical practices, coercive


mandates, or improper actions by health care institutions or


governing bodies.


C. State medical licensing boards, professional oversight


organizations, or any other regulatory authority shall not:


1. Revoke, suspend, or threaten the licensure of a healthcare


professional for engaging in protected speech or whistleblowing


activities related to public health policies or medical mandates; or


2. Investigate or sanction professionals solely for their


public or private statements opposing official medical


recommendations or practices.


D. A cause of action is hereby created for any health care


professional who experiences retaliation, intimidation, or


professional harm as a result of engaging in protected activities


under this act. Such individuals may seek:


1. Injunctive relief to prevent or reverse any adverse actions;


and


2. Compensatory and punitive damages, including reasonable


attorney fees and court costs.


E. Any action taken by a regulatory body against a health care


professional that is alleged to violate this section shall be


subject to expedited judicial review. The burden of proof shall

Req. No. 1436 Page 4


rest on the regulatory body to demonstrate, by clear and convincing


evidence, that the action was unrelated to the professional’s


exercise of protected activities under this act.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1436 DC 1/19/2025 5:46:27 AM































Req. No. 1436 Page 5